District of Columbia statutes.
22-3226.08

Abusive telemarketing acts or practices.

It is an abusive telemarketing act or practice and violation of this subchapter for a seller or telephone solicitor to engage in the following conduct:

(1)

Cause a telephone to ring more than 15 times in an intended telephone solicitation call;

(2)

Initiate a telephone solicitation call to a consumer after the same consumer has expressly stated that he or she does not wish to receive solicitation calls from that seller; or

(3)

Engage in telephone solicitation to a consumer’s residence at any time before 8:00 a.m. and after 9:00 p.m., local time at the place of the consumer called.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 126h
as added June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 102, 47 DCR 7039
This section is referenced in § 22-3226.11.